Utah statutes.
10-3-713.   Recording, numbering, and certification of passage.
The municipal recorder shall record, in a book used exclusively for that
purpose, all ordinances passed by the governing body. The recorder shall give
each ordinance a number, if the governing body has not already so done.
Immediately following each ordinance, or codification of ordinances, the
recorder shall make or cause to be made a certificate stating the date of
passage and of the date of publication or posting, as required. The record and
memorandum, or a certified copy thereof, shall be prima facie evidence of the
contents, passage, and publication or posting of the ordinance or
codification.
